North Carolina, session 2025, SB280.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. CHILD WELFARE CASE ESCALATION TEAM
SECTION 1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2C. Child Welfare Case Escalation Team.
"§ 108A-15.25. Child Welfare Case Escalation Team.
(a) Child Welfare Case Escalation Team. – The Division shall maintain a team of
representatives that conducts escalation assessments, consistent with this section, of juveniles
that have a history of child protective services attention due to a combination of safety and risk
factors. The purpose of the team is to do all of the following:
(1) Support county departments of social services.
(2) Provide an additional level of review to ensure child safety statewide.
(3) Provide quality assurance of the child protective services history of a family
who has returned to the attention of child protective services, including
assessing the quality of prior service intervention and further decisions of
services provided to ensure the safety and well-being of juveniles moving
forward with the family.
(b) Staff. – The team is staffed by the Division, including the assigned manager and
escalation specialists. The team shall collaborate and coordinate with (i) regional safety manager,
(ii) the director of the county department of social services where the juvenile subject to the
escalation notification form resides, and (iii) local law enforcement.
"§ 108A-15.26. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Caretaker. – As defined in G.S. 7B-101.
(2) Division. – The Division of Social Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(3) Extensive child welfare history. – Any one or more of the following:
*S280-v-6*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Involvement of a medically complex juvenile with any prior child
welfare history who requires subspecialty care by two or more
specialties.
b. Receipt of a second report for medical neglect within six months of
the current report.
c. Involvement of a juvenile that requires devices to sustain their
function, such as a tracheostomy or gastric tube, who has had three or
more prior cases for concerns of medical neglect.
d. Families with five or more child protective services cases with
concerns for neglect regardless of case decision or families that have
three or more cases, if any of those cases involved concerns for abuse.
e. Families that have three or more prior child protective services reports
with concerns for domestic violence or active or current drug activity.
f. Any report on an active temporary safety provider, kinship care
provider, or legal guardian.
g. Cases in which there exists a previous child protective services history
with the family and involves a near fatality of a juvenile.
h. Any case that has had a prior history involving a child fatality as a
result of concerns for abuse or neglect where any child currently
resides in the home.
i. Multiple prior involvements with child welfare services, including
in-home services or permanency planning.
(4) High-risk home. – A home or individual that meets any of the following
criteria:
a. Extensive child welfare history.
b. Two or more known screened out reports alleging abuse or neglect of
any juvenile that indicate a pattern of concern despite prior screening
decisions.
c. History of prior removal and placement of any juvenile into foster or
kinship care.
d. Two or more substantiated or unsubstantiated reports that demonstrate
a pattern consistent with chronic or habitual neglect or abuse of any
juvenile.
e. Ongoing medical or mental health neglect, such as repeated reports of
failing to address any juvenile's medical or mental health needs, with
allegations consistent across multiple reports and time frames.
(5) Juvenile. – As defined in G.S. 7B-101.
(6) Near fatality. – As defined in G.S. 7B-2902.
(7) Team. – The Child Welfare Case Escalation Team.
"§ 108A-15.27. Child Welfare Case Escalation Team initial procedure.
(a) Criteria. – The director of the county department of social services shall proceed
through the process of notification of the Child Welfare Case Escalation Team under subsection
(b) of this section if a county department of social services receives a report of abuse or neglect
to screen under Article 3 of Subchapter I of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes that involves a
juvenile residing or located in a high-risk home.
(b) Notification. – If a child welfare report meets the criteria of subsection (a) of this
section, the receiving county department of social services shall complete an escalation
notification form within two business days and return via email or automated process to the
escalation team.
(c) Information Sharing. – The assigned escalation specialist shall coordinate with the
county department of social services to obtain access to the entirety of each case record for a
Page 2 Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
high-risk home to address immediate safety of the juvenile. Upon request, the county department
of social services shall provide any records in their possession related to the high-risk home in
which the juvenile is placed, including the juvenile's case, and identified in the escalation
notification form. Pursuant to G.S. 7B-302, the escalation specialist may also demand, in writing,
records in possession of State or local law enforcement.
"§ 108A-15.28. Child welfare case escalation assessment.
(a) Assessment. – Once the escalation specialist receives all pertinent information and
records from the county department of social services under G.S. 108A-15.27, the escalation
specialist shall do all of the following:
(1) Assess child welfare history, including all reports and findings, interviews
conducted and collateral interviews, safety plans developed for the juvenile,
and services provided to the family.
(2) Identify gaps in services and other areas that impact safety of the juvenile.
(3) Review the overall safety planning for the juvenile in the current assessment
to determine if there are additional steps required to ensure safety.
(4) Create a chronological time line of child protective services intervention to
understand the maltreatment factors of concern related to the family to aid in
decision making.
(b) Collaboration. – The escalation specialist assigned to the case and other team
members shall provide necessary technical assistance to the county department of social services
throughout the assessment phase of the child protective services case to identify any patterns or
contributory factors from past history that may impact a caretaker's ability to assess and control
for present danger threats. The escalation specialist shall do all of the following in collaboration
with the county department of social services:
(1) Provide guidance to the county regarding the case decision and in identifying
services needed for incorporation into the family case plan, taking into
account the family's history and interventions identified in the chronological
time line.
(2) Guide current intervention steps and improve practice, any practice concerns
from child protective services involvement, and discuss that involvement with
the county director of social services and regional safety manager.
(c) Response. – The county department of social services shall respond to all unaddressed
safety concerns identified through the team's review process immediately or within the same day
of notification.
(d) Review. – The team and other assigned Division and Department of Health and
Human Services staff shall review records to ensure that practices that have deficiencies are
corrected and there is communication with county department staff and others to improve child
welfare practices at all levels across the county departments of social services."
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), (i) the sum of five hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year and
(ii) the sum of one hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($157,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for six full-time equivalent positions to staff and implement the Child
Welfare Case Escalation Team, as established in this section. These full-time equivalent positions
shall include human services program consultants and one human services program manager.
SECTION 1.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall explore means and resources needed to automate and reduce the burden on the
county workforce to alert the Division of escalation reviews as established under this section.
When exploring these options, the Division shall consider using the Partnership and Technology
Hub for North Carolina to make an automated process for those reviews.
Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) The Division shall amend protocols and rules as necessary to
integrate Child Welfare Case Escalation Team involvement into the entry of a private residence,
as provided for under G.S. 7B-302(h) to ensure seamless and coordinated assistance for juveniles
at risk of abuse or neglect.

PART II. CPS EMPLOYEE ASSESSMENT HOME VISIT AND RECORD
MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 2.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall adopt rules to amend Subchapter 70A of the North Carolina Administrative Code
and update associated Division policies; Child Protective Services Assessments Policy, Protocol,
and Guidance; and the Partnership and Technology Hub for North Carolina to require directors
of departments of social services to require photographs or video evidence to be gathered during
an initial investigative assessment response or initial family assessment response when the
assessment is investigating allegations that a child is an abused or neglected juvenile and that
those photographs or video evidence be maintained as a permanent part of the case file, consistent
with the requirements of Article 3 of Subchapter I of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 7B-302(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) In performing any duties related to the assessment of the report or the provision or
arrangement for protective services, the director may consult with any public or private agencies
or individuals, including the available State or local law enforcement officers who shall assist in
the assessment and evaluation of the seriousness of any report of abuse, neglect, or dependency
when requested by the director. The director or the director's representative may make a written
demand for any information or reports, whether or not confidential, that may in the director's
opinion be relevant to the assessment or provision of protective services. Upon the director's or
the director's representative's request and unless protected by the attorney-client privilege, any
public or private agency or individual shall provide access to and copies of this confidential
information and these records to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations. If a
custodian of criminal investigative information or records believes that release of the information
will jeopardize the right of the State to prosecute a defendant or the right of a defendant to receive
a fair trial or will undermine an ongoing or future investigation, it may seek an order from a court
of competent jurisdiction to prevent disclosure of the information. In such an action, the custodian
of the records shall have the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence evidence, or
clear and convincing evidence if the request is from the Child Welfare Case Escalation Team
pursuant to a written demand under G.S. 108A-15.27(c), that disclosure of the information in
question will jeopardize the right of the State to prosecute a defendant or the right of a defendant
to receive a fair trial or will undermine an ongoing or future investigation. Actions brought
pursuant to this paragraph shall be set down for immediate hearing, and subsequent proceedings
in the actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts."

PART III. RECOGNITION OF CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT TRAINING
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for training for child
protective services employees and social workers employed by county departments of social
services to recognize abuse and neglect. Once developed, the Division shall ensure that this
training is virtually available for future trainings and continuing education for those employees
that need it. The Division shall prioritize training specialists prior to dissemination to the entirety
of social workers statewide.

PART IV. LIABILITY
Page 4 Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. The North Carolina Department of Justice shall provide
recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services
on reducing the State's liability and placing some liability on the county when a county
department of social services fails to follow statutory requirements or the State's policies and
procedures regarding the provision of child welfare services. The North Carolina Department of
Justice shall provide its recommendations, including any necessary statutory changes to
effectuate those recommendations, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services no later than March 1, 2027.

PART V. PROCEDURE FOR EXPUNGEMENT FROM RESPONSIBLE INDIVIDUALS
LIST
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 7B-200(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The court has exclusive, original jurisdiction over any case involving a juvenile who
is alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent. This jurisdiction does not extend to cases
involving adult defendants alleged to be guilty of abuse or neglect. The court also has exclusive
original jurisdiction of the following proceedings:
…
(9) Petitions for judicial review of a director's determination Proceedings
involving placement on or expungement from the responsible individuals list
under Article 3A of this Chapter."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 7B-325(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The petition for expungement shall be filed with the district court of the county in
which the abuse or serious neglect report arose. A copy shall be delivered in person or by certified
mail, return receipt requested, to the director of the county department of social services of that
county. who determined the abuse or serious neglect and identified the individual seeking
expungement as a responsible individual. The petition for expungement shall contain the name,
date of birth, and address of the individual seeking expungement, the name of the juvenile who
was the subject of the determination of abuse or serious neglect, and facts that invoke the
jurisdiction of the court."

PART VI. CLARIFY CHILD WELFARE PROCEDURE
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 7B-900.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Before ordering that a case be transferred to another county, the court shall find that
the director of the department of social services in the county in which the action is pending and
the director in the county to which transfer is contemplated have communicated about the case
and that:
(1) The two directors are in agreement with respect to each county's responsibility
for providing financial support for the juvenile and services for the juvenile
and the juvenile's family; or
(2) The Director of the Division of Social Services or the Director's designee has
made that determination pursuant to G.S. 153A-257(d).G.S. 153A-257(d) or
appointed a county department of social services to assume management of
the case pursuant to G.S. 7B-302.1(c)."
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 7B-901(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) When the court determines that reunification efforts are not required, the reunification
is excluded as a permanent plan. The court shall order concurrent a permanent plans plan as soon
as possible, after providing each party with a reasonable opportunity to prepare and present
evidence. evidence at a permanency planning hearing. The court shall schedule a permanency
planning hearing within 30 days from the completion of the initial dispositional hearing to
address the permanent plans plan in accordance with G.S. 7B‑906.1 and G.S. 7B‑906.2."
SECTION 6.(c) G.S. 7B-903.1(c1) reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(c1) If juvenile siblings are removed from the home and placed in the nonsecure custody
of a county department of social services, the director shall make reasonable efforts to place the
juvenile siblings in the same home. The director is not required to make reasonable efforts under
this subsection if the director documents that placing the juvenile siblings would be contrary to
the safety or well‑being of any of the juvenile siblings. If, after making reasonable efforts, the
director is unable to place the juvenile siblings in the same home, the director shall make
reasonable efforts to provide frequent sibling visitation and ongoing interaction between the
juvenile siblings, unless the director documents that frequent visitation or other ongoing
interaction between the juvenile siblings would be contrary to the safety or well‑being of any of
the juvenile siblings."
SECTION 6.(d) G.S. 7B-906.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B‑906.1. Review and permanency planning hearings.
…
(e) At any permanency planning hearing where the juvenile is not placed with a parent,
the court shall additionally consider the following criteria and make written findings regarding
those that are relevant:
…
(5) Whether the county department of social services has since the initial
permanency plan planning hearing made reasonable efforts to implement the
permanent plan for the juvenile.
…
(g) At the conclusion of each permanency planning hearing, the court shall make specific
findings as to the best permanent plan or plans to achieve a safe, permanent home for the juvenile
within a reasonable period of time.
…
(m) If the court finds that a proceeding to terminate the parental rights of the juvenile's
parents is necessary in order to perfect the primary or sole permanent plan for the juvenile, the
director of the department of social services shall file a petition to terminate parental rights within
60 calendar days from the date of the entry of the order unless the court makes written findings
regarding why the petition cannot be filed within 60 days. If the court makes findings to the
contrary, the court shall specify the time frame in which any needed petition to terminate parental
rights shall be filed.
…."
SECTION 6.(e) G.S. 7B-906.2(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) At any permanency planning hearing where the court is ordering reunification as a
permanent plan, the court shall adopt concurrent permanent plans and shall identify the primary
plan and secondary plan. Reunification shall be a primary or secondary plan unless the court
relieved the department of making reunification efforts at initial disposition under
G.S. 7B‑901(c), previously made written findings under G.S. 7B‑906.1(d)(3), the permanent plan
is or has been achieved, or the court makes written findings that reunification efforts clearly
would be unsuccessful or would be inconsistent with the juvenile's health or safety. The finding
that reunification efforts clearly would be unsuccessful or inconsistent with the juvenile's health
or safety may be made at any permanency planning hearing, and if made, shall eliminate
reunification as a plan. When reunification has been eliminated as a permanent plan, concurrent
planning is not required. Unless permanence has been achieved, the court shall order the county
department of social services to make efforts toward finalizing the primary and secondary
permanent plans or the sole permanent plan and may specify efforts that are reasonable to timely
achieve permanence for the juvenile."
SECTION 6.(f) G.S. 7B-908(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The court shall consider at least the following in its review and make written findings
regarding the following that are relevant:
Page 6 Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The adequacy of the permanency plan or plans developed by the county
department of social services or a licensed child‑placing agency for a
permanent placement in the juvenile's best interests and the efforts of the
department or agency to implement the plan or plans.
…."
SECTION 6.(g) G.S. 7B-909.2(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) The court shall not enter an order to approve the post‑adoption contact agreement
unless the agreement is in writing and executed prior to or as part of the relinquishment. The
agreement and order shall not be filed in the juvenile proceeding. When the court approves the
post‑adoption contact agreement:
…
(4) The record of the civil action shall be withheld from public inspection and
may only be examined by the parties to the civil action and their attorneys, the
minor adoptee, adoptee after the adoptee turns 18 years old or is otherwise
emancipated, or by order of the court."
SECTION 6.(h) G.S. 7B-909.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-909.3. Modification, enforcement, and termination of a post‑adoption contact
agreement and order; no right to appeal; rights of adoptive parents.
…
(e) A party subject to an order under this section has no right to appeal the order.order
which terminates, modifies, or enforces the post-adoption contact agreement and order.
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, a party to an order under this section has the
right to appeal any order finding him or her in contempt of the order as provided for in Chapter
5A of the General Statutes.
…."

PART VII. TERMINATION OF PARENTAL RIGHTS
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 7B-1101.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) In addition to the right to appointed counsel under subsection (a) of this section, a
guardian ad litem shall be appointed in accordance with G.S. 1A‑1, Rule 17, to represent any
parent who is under the age of 18 years and who is not married or otherwise emancipated.16
years. On motion of any party or on the court's own motion, the court may appoint a guardian ad
litem for a parent who is 16 or 17 years old and who is not married or otherwise emancipated."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 7B-1103(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A petition or motion to terminate the parental rights of either or both parents to his,
her, or their minor juvenile may only be filed by one or more of the following:
…
(4) Any county department of social services, consolidated county human
services agency, or licensed child‑placing agency to which the juvenile has
been surrendered relinquished for adoption by one of the parents or by the
guardian of the person of the juvenile, pursuant to G.S. 48‑3‑701.
(4a) Any county department of social services who has received a safely
surrendered infant, pursuant to Article 5A of this Subchapter.
…."
SECTION 7.(c) G.S. 7B-1112 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-1112. Effects of termination order.
An order terminating the parental rights completely and permanently terminates all rights and
obligations of the parent to the juvenile and of the juvenile to the parent arising from the parental
relationship, except that the juvenile's right of inheritance from the juvenile's parent shall not
terminate until a final order of adoption is issued. The parent is not thereafter entitled to notice
of proceedings to adopt the juvenile and may not object thereto or otherwise participate therein:
Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) If the juvenile had been placed in the custody of or released for adoption by
one parent to a county department of social services or licensed child‑placing
agency and is in the custody of the agency at the time of the filing of the
petition or motion, including a petition or motion filed pursuant to
G.S. 7B‑1103(a)(6), that agency shall, upon entry of the order terminating
parental rights, acquire all of the rights for placement of the juvenile, except
as otherwise provided in G.S. 7B‑908(d), G.S. 7B-908(d1), as the agency
would have acquired had the parent whose rights are terminated released the
juvenile to that agency pursuant to the provisions of Part 7 of Article 3 of
Chapter 48 of the General Statutes, including the right to consent to the
adoption of the juvenile.
…."

PART VIII. UNDISCIPLINED AND DELINQUENT JUVENILES; NONSECURE
CUSTODY
SECTION 8. G.S. 7B-1905(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A juvenile meeting the criteria set out in G.S. 7B‑1903(a), may be placed in nonsecure
custody with a department of social services or a person designated in the order order. The
department of social services with placement responsibility is authorized to place the juvenile for
temporary residential placement in:in one of the following:
(1) A licensed foster home or a home otherwise authorized by law to provide such
care;care.
(2) A facility operated by a department of social services; orservices.
(2a) A facility licensed to provide care to juveniles.
(3) Any other home or facility facility, such as the home of a parent, relative,
nonrelative kin, or other person with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile,
approved by the court and designated in the order.
The department shall not place a juvenile in any unlicensed facility or any facility that is not
licensed to provide care for juveniles without the sanction of the court and so designated in the
order prior to such placement being made.
In placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody, the court shall first consider whether a relative of
the juvenile is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile. If the court
finds that the relative is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision, the court shall
order placement of the juvenile with the relative unless the court finds that placement with the
relative would be contrary to the best interest of the juvenile. Placement of a juvenile outside of
this State shall be in accordance with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children set
forth in Article 38 of this Chapter."

PART IX. INCLUSION OF EASTERN BAND OF CHEROKEE INDIANS IN CHILD
ADVOCACY CENTERS
SECTION 9.(a) G.S. 108A-77.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-77.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(7) Department. – As defined in G.S. 7B-101(8a).G.S. 7B-101 and the Eastern
Band of Cherokee Indians Public Health and Human Services.
…
(10) Multidisciplinary team. – A group of professionals who represent various
disciplines and work collaboratively pursuant to a written protocol to share
information on service provision and investigations by law enforcement or a
department to inform the investigation and prosecution of child maltreatment
Page 8 Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
cases and to coordinate services in response to reports made of child
maltreatment. The multidisciplinary team works solely on behalf of children
served by a Children's Advocacy Center. In addition to the members listed in
this subdivision, a multidisciplinary team may include other professionals
involved in the delivery of services to victims of child maltreatment and their
appropriate caregivers. Participation in a multidisciplinary team shall not
preclude any member from carrying out any mandated responsibility of his or
her profession. A Children's Advocacy Center's multidisciplinary team must
include, at a minimum, the following professionals:
a. A member of participating law enforcement agencies.
b. The county district attorney or assistant district attorney.attorney or
tribal prosecutor for the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.
c. A member of the department's child protective services unit.
d. A local mental health provider.
e. A local health care provider.
f. A victim advocate.
g. Children's Advocacy Center staff.
…."
SECTION 9.(b) G.S. 108A-77.4(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Disclosure of information and records outlined in subsection (b) of this section shall
only be released or otherwise made available to the following:
(1) The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services and county
departments.
(2) Law enforcement agencies, a prosecuting district attorney, attorney, a tribal
prosecutor for the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, or the Attorney General.
(3) Health care providers or local management entity/managed care organizations
providing medical or psychiatric care or services to the child, in the case of
medical or mental health records.
(4) The North Carolina Child Fatality Task Force.
(5) As permitted under G.S. 7B-3100."

PART X. PREDICTIVE RISK MODELING PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 10.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2D. Predictive Risk Modeling for Child Welfare.
"§ 108A-15.30. Predictive Risk Modeling Pilot Program.
(a) Establishment. – The Division of Social Services shall establish a Predictive Risk
Modeling Pilot Program (Program) to deploy a State-validated predictive risk model that
produces risk stratification tiers for children who are the subject of reports of abuse or neglect.
The Program shall be designed to supplement, and not replace, professional judgment by
frontline workers, supervisors, and the Child Welfare Case Escalation Team established under
Part 2C of this Article.
(b) Purpose. – The purpose of the Program is to do all of the following:
(1) Provide an additional layer of statewide visibility and consistency around risk
recognition across counties.
(2) Help frontline staff, supervisors, and escalation teams recognize cumulative
patterns of concern that may otherwise remain fragmented across multiple
referrals, investigations, and system contacts.
(3) Identify cases that warrant enhanced supervisory review, multidisciplinary
consultation, or regional escalation before serious harm occurs.
Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Support more informed screening, investigation, and service-delivery
decisions.
(c) Model Requirements. – The predictive risk model deployed under the Program shall
meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Be purpose-built using North Carolina's own child welfare administrative
data, trained and validated using the State's historical records, policies, and
practice patterns.
(2) Be deployed entirely within the State's own technical infrastructure and may
be integrated directly into the Comprehensive Child Welfare Information
System or the Partnership and Technology Hub for North Carolina.
(3) Produce static statistical risk estimates that are fully human-controlled,
nonautonomous, and do not learn or adapt in operation without express
authorization by the Division.
(4) Undergo rigorous validation using non-system outcomes, specifically child
fatalities and near fatalities, to assess whether the model meaningfully
identifies children at highest risk of serious harm, independent of agency
decision making.
(5) Be subject to equity and fairness analyses stratified by race and ethnicity to
ensure the model performs consistently and does not systematically over- or
underestimate risk for particular subpopulations.
(d) Prohibitions. – The predictive risk model shall not be used as the sole basis for any of
the following:
(1) A decision to screen in or screen out a report of abuse or neglect.
(2) A decision to substantiate or unsubstantiate a finding of abuse or neglect.
(3) A decision to remove a juvenile from the home.
(4) A decision to deny services to a family.
(e) Initial Deployment Modules. – The Division shall initially deploy the predictive risk
model through at least two of the following operational modules:
(1) A hotline call screening module that delivers risk tier information and clinical
alerts to supervisors at the point of screening decisions.
(2) An investigation supervision module that provides supervisors at-a-glance
oversight of open investigations organized by risk designation.
(3) An open in-home case supervision module that provides stratified oversight
based on case-weight complexity.
(4) A practice quality assurance module that offers quality assurance teams a
curated list of cases to oversee based on predictive analytics and business
rules.
(f) Integration With Escalation Team. – The Division shall integrate outputs from the
predictive risk model into the escalation criteria and workflows established under Part 2C of this
Article to enhance the identification of cases warranting team activation.
(g) Ongoing Monitoring. – The Division or its contracted vendor shall provide
continuous monitoring of model performance, validation checks for changes in data or practice,
periodic model retraining when warranted, and regular management and oversight reporting.
Model performance and calibration shall be periodically reassessed by race and ethnicity.
(h) Reporting. – Beginning one year after initial deployment, the Division shall report
annually to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on model
performance metrics, equity analyses, the number of cases flagged for enhanced review, and
outcomes for flagged cases."
SECTION 10.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, (i) the sum of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the
Page 10 Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
customized build and implementation of a State-validated predictive risk model for child welfare
and (ii) the sum of four hundred thirty thousand dollars ($430,000) in recurring funds beginning
in the 2027-2028 fiscal year for ongoing model maintenance and the operation of at least two
deployment modules.
SECTION 10.(c) The Division shall issue a request for proposals or otherwise
procure the predictive risk model in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General
Statutes. The Division may utilize federal funds, including Title IV-E administrative funds, to
offset State costs to the extent permitted under federal law.

PART XI. PUBLIC COUNTY CHILD SAFETY DASHBOARD
SECTION 11.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-15.31. Public county child safety dashboard.
(a) Dashboard Required. – The Division of Social Services shall develop and maintain a
publicly accessible, internet-based county child safety dashboard that reports county-level child
safety performance indicators statewide. The dashboard shall be designed for ease of public
access and shall allow comparison across counties.
(b) Indicators. – The dashboard shall include, at a minimum, the following indicators
reported at the county level:
(1) Timeliness of child protective services response initiation.
(2) Number of reports, investigations, and substantiations.
(3) Recurrence of maltreatment within 12 months.
(4) Child fatalities and near fatalities with prior child protective services contact.
(5) Maltreatment in foster care.
(6) Repeat-report household trends.
(7) Caseload-to-worker ratios.
(c) Update Frequency. – The Division shall update the dashboard at least quarterly.
(d) Confidentiality. – The dashboard shall not disclose personally identifiable
information of any juvenile, family member, or reporter. All data shall be presented in aggregate
at the county level.
(e) Time Line. – The Division shall make the dashboard publicly accessible no later than
July 1, 2028."
SECTION 11.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, (i) the sum of two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for development of the
public county child safety dashboard required by this section and (ii) the sum of seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2027-2028 fiscal year for ongoing
maintenance and hosting.

PART XII. ANNUAL LEGISLATIVE REPORTING ON CHILD WELFARE
ESCALATION
SECTION 12. Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-15.32. Annual report on Child Welfare Case Escalation Team.
(a) Report Required. – Beginning March 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the Division
of Social Services shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services and to the Fiscal Research Division on the activities and findings of the
Child Welfare Case Escalation Team.
(b) Contents. – The report shall include all of the following:
(1) The number of escalation notifications received, by county.
(2) The criteria triggering escalation in each case.
Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) County-level safety trends and recurring operational concerns identified
through the team's work.
(4) Identified statewide patterns of risk.
(5) Intervention activities undertaken and corrective actions recommended or
implemented.
(6) Outcomes for juveniles involved in escalated cases, including successful
interventions that prevented serious injury or death.
(7) Recommendations for additional legislative or administrative reforms.
(8) If the predictive risk model has been deployed, performance metrics and
equity analyses for the model as described in G.S. 108A-15.30(h).
(c) Public Availability. – The Division shall publish the report on its publicly accessible
website within 30 days of submission to the General Assembly."

PART XIII. CHILD FATALITY AND NEAR-FATALITY PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
SECTION 13.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-15.33. Child fatality and near-fatality public disclosure.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section:
(1) "Fatality" means the death of a juvenile.
(2) "Near fatality" means an act that, as certified by a physician, places a juvenile
in serious or critical condition.
(b) Public Notification Required. – Within five business days of receiving a report
involving a child fatality or near fatality for which there is suspected abuse or neglect, or in which
abuse or neglect may have contributed to the child's death or serious injury, the Division shall
provide a preliminary notification to the public on its website as follows:
(1) The age, gender, date of death, and county of the child who has suffered a
fatality or a near fatality.
(2) Whether the county department of social services is investigating the fatality
or near fatality for suspected abuse or neglect.
(3) Whether there have been reports, or any current or past cases, of abuse or
neglect involving the child or the alleged perpetrator.
(4) A detailed synopsis of prior reports or cases of abuse or neglect involving the
child or the alleged perpetrator and of the actions taken or determinations
made by the county department of social services in response to those reports
or cases, including for surviving children in the home.
(5) When available, relevant investigative findings, including, but not limited to,
the manner and cause of death, the nature of injuries in a near fatality, and
coordination with and findings from any related law enforcement
investigation.
(c) Public Case Summary. – Within 90 days after the date of the report for a case
involving a fatality or a near fatality, the Division shall provide to the public a summary report
on its website that includes all of the following:
(1) Any actions taken by the Department in response to the case.
(2) Any changes in policies or practices that have been made to address any issues
raised in the review of the case.
(3) Any recommendations for further changes in policies, practices, rules, or
statutes to address those issues.
(d) Designated Liaison. – The Division shall appoint a designated employee to have
primary responsibility for and serve as the dedicated liaison for all matters regarding child
fatalities and near fatalities, including, but not limited to, management of the public website
Page 12 Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
disclosures required under this section and coordination with the local teams established under
G.S. 7B-1406.5.
(e) Notification to General Assembly. – The Division shall notify the cochairs of the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services within 48 hours of any child
fatality that is under investigation for suspected abuse or neglect and in which there exists a prior
child protective services history with the family.
(f) Confidentiality. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to require disclosure of
information that would violate the confidentiality provisions of G.S. 7B-2901, 42 U.S.C. §
5106a(b)(2)(B)(ix), or any other applicable State or federal law. The Division shall redact any
information whose disclosure is prohibited by law.
(g) No Private Right of Action. – This section does not create a private right of action
against the State, the Division, or any county department of social services."

PART XIV. SAVINGS AND CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 14. Nothing in this act shall be construed to repeal, diminish, or otherwise
limit:
(1) The confidentiality protections for juvenile records established under Article
29 of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.
(2) The rights and protections established under G.S. 7B-302 through
G.S. 7B-311 regarding the assessment and investigation of reports of abuse or
neglect.
(3) The provisions of Part 2A or Part 2B of Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the
General Statutes, as enacted or amended by prior sessions of the General
Assembly.
(4) Any reforms to the child welfare system enacted by the General Assembly
during the 2023, 2024, or 2025 sessions, including, but not limited to,
provisions relating to central intake, structured decision making, supervisor
qualifications, caseworker training requirements, or mandatory reporter
protections.

PART XV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 15. Subsection (a) of Section 1, subsection (b) of Section 2, Part VI,
subsection (a) of Section 10, and subsection (a) of Section 11 of this act become effective October
1, 2026. Subsection (b) of Section 1, Part III, subsection (b) of Section 10, and subsection (b) of
Section 11 of this act become effective July 1, 2026. Part XIII of this act becomes effective
January 1, 2027. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 280-Sixth Edition Page 13